src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/A-09likw_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Adjective - likõ: # Adjective (9) likõ 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     likõ+Hom1+A+Sg+Nom: likõ
     likõ+Hom1+A+Sg+Gen: likõ
     likõ+Hom1+A+Sg+Par: likõt
     likõ+Hom1+A+Sg+Ill: likkõhe
     likõ+Hom1+A+Sg+Ine: likõn
     likõ+Hom1+A+Sg+Ela: likõst
     likõ+Hom1+A+Sg+All: likõlõ
     likõ+Hom1+A+Sg+Ade: likõl
     likõ+Hom1+A+Sg+Abl: likõlt
     likõ+Hom1+A+Sg+Tra: likõs
     likõ+Hom1+A+Sg+Ter: likõniq
     likõ+Hom1+A+Sg+Abe: likõldaq
     likõ+Hom1+A+Sg+Com: likõgaq
     likõ+Hom1+A+Pl+Nom: likõq
     likõ+Hom1+A+Pl+Gen: likkidõ
     likõ+Hom1+A+Pl+Par: likkit
     likõ+Hom1+A+Pl+Ill: likkihe
     likõ+Hom1+A+Pl+Ine: likkin
     likõ+Hom1+A+Pl+Ela: likkist
     likõ+Hom1+A+Pl+All: likkilõ
     likõ+Hom1+A+Pl+Ade: likkil
     likõ+Hom1+A+Pl+Abl: likkilt
     likõ+Hom1+A+Pl+Tra: likkis
     likõ+Hom1+A+Pl+Ter: likkiniq
     likõ+Hom1+A+Pl+Abe: likkildaq
     likõ+Hom1+A+Pl+Com: likkidõgaq
